District of Columbia statutes.
7-703.03

Visits to the home of a resident.

The Ombudsman may communicate and visit with a resident who receives home care services; provided, that the Ombudsman obtains permission from the resident or a representative of the resident to enter the resident’s home.

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-218, § 303
as added Mar. 14, 2012, D.C. Law 19-111, § 2(d), 59 DCR 455
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section 3 of D.C. Law 19-111, see § 7013 of Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-383, June 19, 2012, 59 DCR 7764).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section 3 of D.C. Law 19-111, see § 7013 of Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-413, July 25, 2012, 59 DCR 9290).

Section 3 of D.C. Law 19-111 provided: “Sec. 3. Applicability. This act shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan.”

Section 3 of D.C. Law 19-111 provided that the act shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan. D.C. Law 19-111, § 3, was repealed by D.C. Law 19-168, § 7013.